Hawaii statutes.
§657-38 Possession, interrupting statute.
No person shall be deemed to have been in possession of any lands within the
meaning of this part, merely by reason of having made an entry thereon, unless
the person has continued in open and peaceable possession of the same for the
space of one year after such entry; or unless an action has been commenced upon
the entry within one year after ouster. [L 1870, c 22, §7; am L 1909, c 103,
§1; RL 1925, §2664; RL 1935, §3935; RL 1945, §10446; RL 1955, §241-37; HRS §657-38;
gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Tacking, privity of estate or title. 31 H. 108 (1929).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next